Alaska statutes. Title 39. Public Officers and Employees.
Article 3. Special Hazard Insurance.

Sec. 39.30.130.
Special hazard insurance.

Upon the request of any state department, the Department of Administration may procure insurance, in addition to workers’ compensation insurance, for employees of the department against accidental death or dismemberment occasioned by special hazards in connection with their employment.

History.

(§ 1 ch 227 SLA 1970)